Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.140

Duty of treasurer.

Upon the delivery of money to the treasurer, the treasurer shall place it to the credit of the county.

[ 2004 c 79 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.140. Prior: Code 1881 s 2790; 1863 p 562 s 16; 1854 p 438 s 16; RRS s 4195.]